Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2186.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Each board of education of a school district shall adopt
policies and procedures to govern the use of privately owned electronic
communication devices. Such policies and procedures shall:
(1) Prohibit students from using any privately owned electronic
communication device at school during the normal hours of the school
day, including during passing periods and in the classroom;
(2) set forth disciplinary actions and consequences that may occur if a
student violates such policies and procedures; and
(3) authorize a student to use a privately owned electronic
communication device during the normal hours of a school day only if the
use is:
(A) Required for the implementation of a student's individualized
education program or 504 plan;
(B) authorized by a teacher or administrator for educational purposes,
except that such use shall not be authorized as part of a classroom reward
or free time; or
(C) pre-approved on an individual student basis by a teacher or
administrator due to health concerns, emergency concerns or other special
circumstances.
(b) Each school district board of education shall adopt policies and
procedures to prohibit students from using school computers and devices
to access any social media platform.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) "Privately owned electronic communication device" means any
wireless electronic communication device that:
(A) Provides for voice, text or video communication between two or

HB 2186 2
more parties, including, but not limited to, a mobile or cellular phone,
tablet, computer, watch, text messaging device or personal digital
assistant; and
(B) is not owned or issued to students by the school district or school.
(2) "Social media platform" means a website, application or other
internet medium that:
(A) Permits a person to become a registered user, establish an
account, or create a profile for the purpose of allowing the person to
create, share and view user-generated content through such account or
profile; and
(B) primarily serves as a medium for users to interact with content
generated by other users of the medium.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.